src/numeral-sme-lex.txt
LEXICON GUOKTELOGIGUHTTA
guhtta+Num+Sg+Nom:e%>#logi#guhtta%> K ;
guhtta+Num+Ess:e%>#logi#guhtta%>n K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Acc:e%>#logi#guhtta%> K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Gen:e%>#logi#guđa%> K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Gen:e%>#logi#guđa»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc:e%>#logi#guđa%>s K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:e%>#logi#guđa%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
guhtta+Num+Sg+Ill:e%>#logi#guhtti%>j K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>#logi#guđa%> K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e%>#logi#guđa%> K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#guđa%>jn K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Nom:e%>#logi#guđa%>t K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Acc:e%>#logi#guđa%>X5jd K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Gen:e%>#logi#guđa%>X5jd K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:e%>#logi#guđa%>X5jd K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:e%>#logi#guđa%>X5jd K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Ill:e%>#logi#guđa%>jde K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#guđa%>jn K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Com:e%>#logi#guđa%>guin K ;

LEXICON VIHTTALOGIGUHTTA
guhtta+Num+Sg+Nom:ihtta%>#logi#guhtta%> K ;
guhtta+Num+Ess:htta%>#logi#guhtta%>n K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Acc:htta%>#logi#guhtta%> K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Gen:htta%>#logi#guđa%> K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Gen:htta%>#logi#guđa»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc:htta%>#logi#guđa%>s K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:htta%>#logi#guđa%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
guhtta+Num+Sg+Ill:htta%>#logi#guhtti%>j K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:htta%>#logi#guđa%> K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:htta%>#logi#guđa%> K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#guđa%>jn K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Nom:htta%>#logi#guđa%>t K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Acc:htta%>#logi#guđa%>X5jd K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Gen:htta%>#logi#guđa%>X5jd K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:htta%>#logi#guđa%>X5jd K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:htta%>#logi#guđa%>X5jd K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Ill:htta%>#logi#guđa%>jde K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#guđa%>jn K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Com:htta%>#logi#guđa%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GOLBMALOGICIEZA
čieža+Num+Sg+Nom:%>#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Ess:%>#logi#čieža%>n K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Acc:%>#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#čieža%>  K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#čieža»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Loc:%>#logi#čieža%>s K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>#logi#čieža%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#čihčči%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#čihči%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#čiži%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>#logi#čieža%>  K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>#logi#čieža%>  K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Nom:%>#logi#čieža%>t K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Acc:%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Gen:%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Ill:%>#logi#čieža%>jde K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Com:%>#logi#čieža%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GAVCCILOGICIEZA
čieža+Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Ess:%>#logi#čieža%>n K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Acc:%>#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#čieža%>  K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#čieža»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Loc:%>#logi#čieža%>s K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>#logi#čieža%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#čihčči%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#čihči%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#čiži%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>#logi#čieža%>  K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>#logi#čieža%>  K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Nom:%>#logi#čieža%>t K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Acc:%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Gen:%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Ill:%>#logi#čieža%>jde K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Com:%>#logi#čieža%>jguin K ;


LEXICON GUOKTELOGICIEZA
čieža+Num+Sg+Nom:e%>#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Ess:e%>#logi#čieža%>n K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Acc:e%>#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Gen:e%>#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Gen:e%>#logi#čieža»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Loc:e%>#logi#čieža%>s K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:e%>#logi#čieža%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:e%>#logi#čihčči%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:e%>#logi#čihči%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:e%>#logi#čiži%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e%>#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Nom:e%>#logi#čieža%>t K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Acc:e%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Gen:e%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:e%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:e%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Ill:e%>#logi#čieža%>jde K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Com:e%>#logi#čieža%>jguin K ;

LEXICON VIHTTALOGICIEZA
čieža+Num+Sg+Nom:ihtta%>#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Ess:htta%>#logi#čieža%>n K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Acc:htta%>#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Gen:htta%>#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Gen:htta%>#logi#čieža»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Loc:htta%>#logi#čieža%>s K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:htta%>#logi#čieža%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:htta%>#logi#čihčči%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:htta%>#logi#čihči%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:htta%>#logi#čiži%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:htta%>#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:htta%>#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Nom:htta%>#logi#čieža%>t K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Acc:htta%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Gen:htta%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Ill:htta%>#logi#čieža%>jde K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:htta%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:htta%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Com:htta%>#logi#čieža%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GOLBMALOGIGAVCCI
gávcci+Num+Sg+Nom:%>#logi#gávcci%> K ;
gávcci+Num+Ess:%>#logi#gávcci%>n K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Acc:%>#logi#gávcci%> K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#gávcci%>  K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#gávcci»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc:%>#logi#gávcci%>s K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>#logi#gávcci%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
gávcci+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#gákcá%>j K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>#logi#gávcci%>  K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>#logi#gávcci%>  K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#gávcci%>jn K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Nom:%>#logi#gávcci%>t K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Acc:%>#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Gen:%>#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Ill:%>#logi#gávcci%>jde K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#gávcci%>jn K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Com:%>#logi#gávcci%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GAVCCILOGIGAVCCI
gávcci+Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#logi#gávcci%> K ;
gávcci+Num+Ess:%>#logi#gávcci%>n K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Acc:%>#logi#gávcci%> K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#gávcci%>  K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#gávcci»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc:%>#logi#gávcci%>s K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>#logi#gávcci%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
gávcci+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#gákcá%>j K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>#logi#gávcci%>  K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>#logi#gávcci%>  K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#gávcci%>jn K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Nom:%>#logi#gávcci%>t K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Acc:%>#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Gen:%>#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Ill:%>#logi#gávcci%>jde K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#gávcci%>jn K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Com:%>#logi#gávcci%>jguin K ;

LEXICON 21TO99
guoktelogi:guok't GUOKTELOGIGUHTTA ;
guoktelogi:guok't GUOKTELOGICIEZA ;
golbmalogi:golbma GOLBMALOGICIEZA ;
golbmalogi:golbma GOLBMALOGIGAVCCI ;
njealljelogi:njeallj GUOKTELOGIGUHTTA ;
njealljelogi:njeallj GUOKTELOGICIEZA ;
vihttalogi:vi VIHTTALOGIGUHTTA ;
vihttalogi:vi VIHTTALOGICIEZA ;
guhttalogi:gu VIHTTALOGIGUHTTA ;
guhttalogi:gu VIHTTALOGICIEZA ;
čiežalogi:čieža GOLBMALOGICIEZA ;
giežalogi:gieža GOLBMALOGICIEZA ;
čiežalogi:čieža GOLBMALOGIGAVCCI ;
giežalogi:gieža GOLBMALOGIGAVCCI ;
gávccilogi:gák'ci GAVCCILOGICIEZA ;
gávccilogi:gák'ci GAVCCILOGIGAVCCI ;
ovccilogi:ok'ci GAVCCILOGICIEZA ;
ovccilogi:ok'ci GAVCCILOGIGAVCCI ;
